District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-113.06

Plat to be files — Assessment.

Repealed.

History

Jan. 30, 1925, 43 Stat. 800, ch. 116, § 2
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 722, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-123, 7-124.